Hawaii statutes.
§507-19 Enforcement of lien. The
holder of any lien provided for in section 507-18 may, upon obtaining judgment
for the amount due for the repairs, alterations, or improvements, have
execution upon the property so held by the holder for the satisfaction of the
holder's judgment. The execution shall be issued and returned as in other
civil actions. [L 1921, c 131, §2; RL 1925, §2905; RL 1935, §4372; RL 1945,
§8776; RL 1955, §193-22; HRS §507-19; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next